Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-527
Grounds; abandonment; sale; costs and expenses.

The court shall make such order in regard to the taxation and payment of costs in the premises as to the court shall seem just and proper, and the court shall have authority in such case to provide for the payment of the costs and expenses of said proceeding out of the funds belonging to the said cemetery association or the proceeds of the sale of any such real estate.

Laws 1907, c. 27, § 7, p. 149;

R.S.1913, § 694;

C.S.1922, § 603;

C.S.1929, § 13-516;

R.S.1943, § 12-527.